Oklahoma, session 2025, SB529.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 589 of Title 47, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. As used in this section:


Req. No. 1970 Page 1

1. “Exempt used powersports vehicle retailer” means a used
powersports vehicle retailer designated by the Oklahoma Tax
Commission pursuant to subsection B of this section;
2. “Used powersports vehicle” means any used motorcycle,
scooter, moped, all-terrain vehicle, or utility vehicle required to
be registered under the Oklahoma Vehicle License and Registration
Act, with the exception of all-terrain vehicles, utility vehicles,
and motorcycles used exclusively for off-road use which are sold by
a retail implement dealer, as defined in Section 581 of Title 47 of
the Oklahoma Statutes; and
3. “Used powersports vehicle retailer” means any person, firm,
or corporation, resident or nonresident, that is in the business of
selling any used powersports vehicles except for retail implement
dealers.
B. A used powersports vehicle retailer engaged in business in
this state may make application annually to the Oklahoma Tax
Commission to be designated an exempt used powersports vehicle
retailer. Such application shall demonstrate that the primary
source of revenue for such retailer is used powersport vehicles.
The Tax Commission, upon receipt of such application, shall confirm
such application and shall grant such designation for a period of
one (1) year.
C. The Tax Commission shall have the authority to promulgate
rules to enact the provisions of this act.
Req. No. 1970 Page 2

SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 2105, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 71, O.S.L. 2023 (68 O.S. Supp. 2024,
Section 2105), is amended to read as follows:
Section 2105. An original or a transfer certificate of title
shall be issued without the payment of the excise tax levied by
Section 2101 et seq. of this title for:
1. Any vehicle owned by a nonresident person who operates
principally in some other state but who is in Oklahoma only
occasionally;
2. Any vehicle brought into this state by a person formerly
living in another state, who has owned and registered the vehicle in
such other state of residence at least sixty (60) days prior to the
time it is required to be registered in this state; provided,
however, this paragraph shall not apply to businesses engaged in
renting cars without a driver;
3. Any vehicle registered by this state, by any of the
political subdivisions thereof, or by a fire department organized
pursuant to Section 592 of Title 18 of the Oklahoma Statutes to be
used for the purposes of the fire department, or a vehicle which is
the subject of a lease or lease-purchase agreement executed between
the person seeking an original or transfer certificate of title for
the vehicle and a municipality, county, school district, or fire
protection district. The person seeking an original or transfer
certificate of title shall provide adequate proof that the vehicle
Req. No. 1970 Page 3

is s ubject to a lease or lease-purchase agreement with a
municipality, county, school district, or fire protection district
at the time the excise tax levied would otherwise be payable.
Service Oklahoma shall have the authority to determine what
constitutes adequate proof as required by this section;
4. Any vehicle, the legal ownership of which is obtained by the
applicant for a certificate of title by inheritance. For the
purposes of this section, “inheritance” means any transfer from a
deceased individual to the direct successor in interest of the
decedent without consideration, whether through probate,
administration, inter vivos trust, transfer-on-death designation, or
joint ownership;
5. Any used motor vehicle, travel trailer, or commercial
trailer which is owned and being offered for sale by a person
licensed as a dealer to sell the same, under the provisions of the
Oklahoma Vehicle License and Registration Act:
a. if such vehicle, travel trailer, or commercial trailer
has been registered in Oklahoma and the excise tax
paid thereon, or
b. when such vehicle, travel trailer, or commercial
trailer has been registered in some other state but is
not the latest manufactured model.
Provided, the provisions of this paragraph shall not be
construed as allowing an exemption to any person not licensed as a
Req. No. 1970 Page 4

deal er of used motor vehicles, travel trailers, or commercial
trailers, or as an automotive dismantler and parts recycler in this
state;
6. Any vehicle which was purchased by a person licensed to sell
new or used motor vehicles in another state if:
a. such vehicle is not purchased for operation or resale
in this state, and
b. the state from which the dealer is licensed offers
reciprocal privileges to a dealer licensed in this
state, pursuant to a reciprocal agreement between the
duly authorized agent of Service Oklahoma and the
licensing state;
7. Any vehicle, the ownership of which was obtained by the
lienholder or mortgagee under or by foreclosure of a lien or
mortgage in the manner provided by law or to the insurer under
subrogated rights arising by reason of loss under an insurance
contract;
8. Any vehicle which is taxed on an ad valorem basis;
9. Any vehicle or motor vehicle, the legal ownership of which
is obtained by transfers:
a. from one corporation to another corporation pursuant
to a reorganization. As used in this subparagraph,
the term “reorganization” means:
(1) a statutory merger or consolidation, or
Req. No. 1970 Page 5

(2) the acquisition by a corporation of substantially
all of the properties of another corporation when
the consideration is solely all or a part of the
voting stock of the acquiring corporation, or of
its parent or subsidiary corporation,
b. in connection with the winding up, dissolution, or
liquidation of a corporation only when there is a
distribution in kind to the shareholders of the
property of such corporation,
c. to a corporation where the former owners of the
vehicle or motor vehicle transferred are, immediately
after the transfer, in control of the corporation, and
the stock or securities received by each is
substantially in proportion to the interest in the
vehicle or motor vehicle prior to the transfer,
d. to a partnership if the former owners of the vehicle
or motor vehicle transferred are, immediately after
the transfer, members of such partnership and the
interest in the partnership received by each is
substantially in proportion to the interest in the
vehicle or motor vehicle prior to the transfer,
e. from a partnership to the members thereof when made in
the dissolution of such partnership,

Req. No. 1970 Page 6

f. to a limited liability company if the former owners of
the vehicle or motor vehicle transferred are,
immediately after the transfer, members of the limited
liability company and the interest in the limited
liability company received by each is substantially in
proportion to the interest in the vehicle or motor
vehicle prior to the transfer, or
g. from a limited liability company to the members
thereof when made in the dissolution of such
partnership;
10. Any vehicle which is purchased by a person to be used by a
business engaged in renting motor vehicles without a driver,
provided:
a. the vehicle shall not be rented to the same person for
a period exceeding ninety (90) days,
b. any such vehicle exempted from the excise tax by these
provisions shall not be placed under any type of lease
agreement,
c. on any such vehicle exempted from the excise tax by
this paragraph that is reregistered in this state,
without a prior sale or transfer to the persons
specified in divisions (1) and (2) of this
subparagraph, at any time prior to the expiration of
twelve (12) months from the date of issuance of the
Req. No. 1970 Page 7

original title, the seller shall pay immediately the
amount of excise tax which would have been due had
this exemption not been granted plus a penalty of
twenty percent (20%). No such excise tax or penalty
shall become due and payable if the vehicle is sold or
transferred in a condition either physical or
mechanical which would render it eligible for a
salvage title pursuant to law or if the vehicle is
sold and transferred in this state at any time prior
to the expiration of twelve (12) months:
(1) to the manufacturer of the vehicle or its
controlled financing arm, or
(2) to a factory authorized franchised new motor
vehicle dealer which holds a franchise of the
same line-make of the vehicle being purchased, or
d. when this exemption is claimed, Service Oklahoma shall
issue a special title which shall restrict the
transfer of the title only within this state prior to
the expiration of twelve (12) months unless:
(1) payment of the excise tax plus penalty as
provided in this section is made,
(2) the sale is made to a person specified in
division (1) or (2) of subparagraph c of this
paragraph, or
Req. No. 1970 Page 8

(3) the vehicle is eligible for a salvage title.
For all other tax purposes vehicles herein exempted shall be
treated as though the excise tax has been paid;
11. Any vehicle of the latest manufactured model, registered
from a title in the name of the original manufacturer or assigned to
the original manufacturer and issued by any state and transferred to
a licensed, franchised Oklahoma motor vehicle dealer, as defined by
Section 1102 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes, which holds a
franchise of the same line-make as the vehicle being registered;
12. Any new motor vehicle, registered in the name of a
manufacturer or dealer of new motor vehicles, for which a license
plate has been issued pursuant to Section 1116.1 of Title 47 of the
Oklahoma Statutes, if such vehicle is authorized by the manufacturer
or dealer for personal use by an individual. The authorization for
such use shall not exceed four (4) months which shall not be renewed
or the exemption provided by this paragraph shall not be applicable.
The exemption provided by this paragraph shall not be applicable to
a transfer of ownership or registration subsequent to the first
registration of the vehicle by a manufacturer or dealer;
13. Any vehicle, travel trailer, or commercial trailer of the
latest manufacturer model purchased by a franchised Oklahoma dealer
licensed to sell the same which holds a franchise of the same line-
make as the vehicle, travel trailer, or commercial trailer being
registered;
Req. No. 1970 Page 9

14. Any vehicle which is the subject of a lease or lease-
purchase agreement and which the ownership of such vehicle is being
obtained by the lessee, if the vehicle excise tax was paid at the
time of the initial lease or lease-purchase agreement;
15. Any vehicle which:
a. is purchased by a private, nonprofit organization
which is exempt from taxation pursuant to the
provisions of Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal
Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, 26 U.S.C., Section
501(c)(3), and which is primarily funded by a
fraternal or civic service organization with at least
one hundred local chapters or clubs, and
b. is designed and used to provide mobile health
screening services to the general public at no cost to
the recipient, and for which no reimbursement of any
kind is received from any health insurance provider,
health maintenance organization, or governmental
program;
16. Any vehicle which is purchased by an individual who has
been honorably discharged from active service in any branch of the
Armed Forces of the United States or Oklahoma National Guard and who
has been certified by the United States Department of Veterans
Affairs, its successor, or the Armed Forces of the United States to
be a disabled veteran in receipt of compensation at the one-hundred-
Req. No. 1970 Page 10

perc ent rate for a permanent disability sustained through military
action or accident resulting from disease contracted while in such
active service and registered with the veterans registry created by
the Oklahoma Department of Veterans Affairs; provided, that if the
veteran has previously received exemption pursuant to this
paragraph, no registration with the veterans registry shall be
required. This exemption may not be claimed by an individual for
more than one vehicle in a consecutive three-year period, unless the
vehicle is a replacement for a vehicle which was destroyed and
declared by the insurer to be a total loss claim. Service Oklahoma
shall promulgate any rules necessary to implement the provisions of
this section; or
17. Any vehicle on which ownership is transferred by a
repossessor directly back to the owner or owners from whom the
vehicle was repossessed; provided, ownership shall be assigned by
the repossessor within thirty (30) days of issuance of the
repossession title and shall be identical to that reflected in the
vehicle title record immediately prior to the repossession; or
18. Any used powersports vehicle purchased from an exempt used
powersports vehicle retailer designated pursuant to Section 1 of
this act.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-1970 CAD 3/26/2025 2:05:01 PM
Req. No. 1970 Page 11

























Req. No. 1970 Page 12